Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-203
Drainage supervisors, county board act as; powers.

The members of the county board shall be the drainage supervisors in and for their respective counties, and as such shall be a body politic and corporate, and shall be the corporate authorities of all the drainage districts within their respective counties.

Laws 1911, c. 142, § 3, p. 467;

R.S.1913, § 1773;

C.S.1922, § 1720;

C.S.1929, § 31-303;

R.S.1943, § 31-203.